Utah statutes.
70A-3-309.   Enforcement of lost, destroyed, or stolen instrument.
(1)  A person not in possession of an instrument is entitled to enforce the
instrument if:
(a)  the person was in possession of the instrument and entitled to enforce it
when loss of possession occurred;
(b)  the loss of possession was not the result of a transfer by the person or
a lawful seizure; and
(c)  the person cannot reasonably obtain possession of the instrument because
the instrument was destroyed, its whereabouts cannot be determined, or it is
in the wrongful possession of an unknown person or a person that cannot be
found or is not amenable to service of process.
(2)  A person seeking enforcement of an instrument under Subsection (1) must
prove the terms of the instrument and the person's right to enforce the
instrument.  If that proof is made, Section 70A-3-308 applies to the case as
if the person seeking enforcement had produced the instrument. The court may
not enter judgment in favor of the person seeking enforcement unless it finds
that the person required to pay the instrument is adequately protected against
loss that might occur by reason of a claim by another person to enforce the
instrument.  Adequate protection may be provided by any reasonable means.
